Utah statutes.
4-7-5.   Exemptions.
The surety and licensing requirements of this chapter do not apply to:
(1)  any livestock market which is bonded as required by laws of the United
States and Title 4, Chapter 30, Livestock Markets; or
(2)  any cooperative incorporated under the laws of this state or another
state, except as to the receipt of products of agriculture from a nonmember
producer.
